Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-798
Livestock certification program; application; costs.

A livestock producer may request certification by completing an application for herd certification on a form provided by the department. The livestock producers who choose to participate in a voluntary livestock certification program shall pay the primary costs of the program, including all on-farm testing costs. The department may use funds appropriated by the Legislature, when available, to offset the costs of disease research and laboratory testing when done in conjunction with a voluntary livestock certification program.

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 11.

Definitions, where found, see section 54-2902.